District of Columbia statutes.
31-1631.12

Scope.

This chapter shall not apply to:

(1)

An adjuster for or an agent or employee of an insurer or group of insurers under common control or ownership that, as a representative of the insurer or group, adjusts losses or damages under policies issued by the insurer or group;

(2)

A broker that acts as an adjuster without compensation for an insured for whom the broker is acting as a broker;

(3)

An attorney at law who does not:

(A)

Regularly act as a public insurance adjuster; or

(B)

Represent to the public by sign, advertisement, or other written or oral communication indicating that the attorney at law acts as a public insurance adjuster; or

(4)

A licensed health care provider, or employee of a licensed health care provider, who prepares or files a health insurance claim form on behalf of a patient, a licensed insurance agent, or salaried employee of an insurance company.

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-256, § 12, 50 DCR 238